California statutes. Education Code
(3) Local educational agencies receiving grants
 pursuant to this subdivision shall do both of the following:

(A) Commit to providing program data to the department, as specified by the department, including, but not limited to, recipient information and participating in overall program evaluation.

(B) Develop a plan for consideration by the governing board or body at a public meeting on or before June 30, 2022, for how all children in the attendance area of the local educational agency will have access to full-day learning programs the year before kindergarten that meet the needs of parents, including through partnerships with the local educational agency’s expanding learning offerings, the After School Education and Safety Program, the California state preschool program, Head Start programs, and other community-based early learning and care programs.

(4) (A) Funds that are allocated or awarded pursuant to this subdivision shall be expended by June 30, 2028. Notwithstanding any other law, on June 30, 2030, any unexpended funds of the amount awarded for purposes of this subdivision shall revert to the General Fund.

(B) The department shall initiate collection proceedings for grant funds used by local educational agencies in a manner inconsistent with the requirements of this section, including, but not limited to, failing to submit all required data pursuant to paragraph (3).

(C) The department may allocate or prorate any returned or collected funds pursuant to this subdivision for the purposes provided in subdivision (f).

(d) (1) For the 2022–23 fiscal year, the sum of three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the department for allocation to local educational agencies for the California Prekindergarten Planning and Implementation Grant Program pursuant to this section. These funds shall be available for encumbrance until June 30, 2026. The department shall allocate funds to local educational agencies as follows:

(A) A minimum base grant to all local educational agencies that operate kindergarten programs, as determined using California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System Fall 1 kindergarten enrollment from the 2021–22 certification, as follows:

(i) For local educational agencies with an enrollment of 1 to 500 pupils, inclusive, the minimum base grant shall
 be twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(ii) For local educational agencies with an enrollment of 501 or more pupils, the minimum base grant shall be fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(B) A minimum base grant for each county office of education of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) for each local educational agency in their county that operates kindergarten programs to support countywide planning and capacity building.

(C) Of the funds remaining after the allocations pursuant to subparagraphs (A) and (B):

(i) Sixty percent shall be available as enrollment grants. These grants shall be allocated based on the local educational agency’s proportional share of total California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System Fall 1 kindergarten enrollment for
 the 2021–22 fiscal year, as applied to the total amount of program funds available for the enrollment grant. For purposes of this clause, the total statewide kindergarten enrollment shall be calculated using the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System Fall 1 kindergarten enrollment minus the transitional kindergarten program enrollment for the 2020–21 fiscal year for each local educational agency.

(ii) Forty percent shall be available as supplemental grants. These grants shall be allocated based on the local educational agency’s California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System Fall 1 kindergarten enrollment minus the transitional kindergarten program enrollment for the 2020–21 fiscal year, multiplied by the local educational agency’s unduplicated pupil percentage, as calculated pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 42238.02 or subdivision (b) of Section 2574, as applicable, and certified as of the second principal
 apportionment. Funds for this purpose shall be distributed percent-to-total from funds available for the supplemental grant.

(D) Notwithstanding any other law, any kindergarten enrollment reported by a county office of education shall be attributed to the school district of geographic residence.

(2) Grant funds may be used for costs associated with creating or expanding California state preschool programs or transitional kindergarten programs, or to establish or strengthen partnerships with other providers of prekindergarten education within the local educational agency, including Head Start programs, to ensure that high-quality options for prekindergarten education are available for children four years of age. Allowable costs shall include, but are not necessarily limited to, classroom operating costs, planning costs, hiring and recruitment costs, staff training and professional
 development, classroom materials, and supplies.

(3) Local educational agencies receiving grants pursuant to this subdivision shall do all of the following:

(A) Commit to providing program data to the department, as specified by the department, including, but not limited to, recipient information and participating in overall program evaluation.

(B) If the local educational agency did not develop the plan required pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (c), develop a plan for consideration by the governing board or body at a public meeting on or before March 30, 2023, for how all children in the attendance area of the local educational agency will have access to full-day learning programs the year before kindergarten that meet the needs of parents, including through partnerships with the local
 educational agency’s expanding learning offerings, the After School Education and Safety Program, the California state preschool program, Head Start programs, and other community-based early learning and care programs. A plan developed pursuant to this subparagraph satisfies the requirements of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (c).

(C) Ensure expenditures are consistent with their local plan adopted pursuant to subdivision (c).

(D) Commit to planning with their county’s local planning council, local tribes, and the California state preschool program and Head Start program providers in their region.

(E) Offer transitional kindergarten to all eligible pupils interested in transitional kindergarten within their attendance area by the 2025–26 school year.

(4) (A) Funds allocated or awarded pursuant to this subdivision shall be expended by June 30, 2028. Notwithstanding any other law, on June 30, 2030, any unexpended funds of the amount awarded for purposes of this subdivision shall revert to the General Fund.

(B) The department may allocate or prorate any returned or collected funds pursuant to this subdivision for the purposes provided in subdivision (f).

(5) The department shall initiate collection proceedings for grant funds used by local educational agencies in a manner inconsistent with the requirements of this section, including, but not limited to,
 failing to submit all required data pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3).

(e) (1) For the 2026–27 fiscal year, the sum of two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the department for allocation to local educational agencies for the California Prekindergarten Planning and Implementation Grant Program pursuant to this section. These funds shall be available for encumbrance until June 30, 2032. The department shall allocate funds to local educational agencies as follows:

(A) A minimum base grant to all local educational agencies that operate kindergarten programs, as determined using California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System Fall 1 kindergarten enrollment from the 2025–26 certification, as follows:

(i) For local educational
 agencies with an enrollment of 1 to 500 pupils, inclusive, the minimum base grant shall be twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(ii) For local educational agencies with an enrollment of 501 or more pupils, the minimum base grant shall be fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(B) A minimum base grant for each county office of education of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) for each local educational agency in their county that operates kindergarten programs to support countywide planning and capacity building.

(C) Of the funds remaining after the allocations pursuant to subparagraphs (A) and (B):

(i) Sixty percent shall be available as enrollment grants. These grants shall be allocated based on the local educational agency’s proportional share of total
 California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System Fall 1 kindergarten enrollment for the 2025–26 fiscal year, as applied to the total amount of program funds available for the enrollment grant.

(ii) Forty percent shall be available as supplemental grants. These grants shall be allocated based on the local educational agency’s California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System Fall 1 kindergarten enrollment for the 2025–26 fiscal year, multiplied by the local educational agency’s unduplicated pupil percentage, as calculated pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 42238.02 or subdivision (b) of Section 2574, as applicable, and certified as of the second principal apportionment. Funds for this purpose shall be distributed percent-to-total from funds available for the supplemental grant.

(D) Notwithstanding any other law, any kindergarten enrollment reported by a county office
 of education shall be attributed to the school district of geographic residence.

(2) (i) Grant funds may be used for costs associated with creating or expanding developmentally appropriate California state preschool programs or transitional kindergarten programs, or to establish or strengthen partnerships with other providers of prekindergarten education within the local educational agency, including Head Start programs, to ensure that high-quality options for prekindergarten education are available for children four years of age. Allowable costs shall include, but are not necessarily limited to, planning costs, hiring and recruitment costs, staff training and professional development, developmentally appropriate classroom materials and furnishings, and supplies.

(ii) It is the intent of the Legislature that local educational agencies support ongoing
 professional development for preschool and transitional kindergarten educators and site administrators on developmentally appropriate curricula pursuant to Section 48000 and best practices in the classroom, including, but not limited to, behavioral supports and early childhood behavioral interventions.

(iii) It is further the intent of the Legislature that local educational agencies use funds pursuant to this subdivision to increase the number of highly qualified teachers, classroom aides, and site administrators available to serve California state preschool programs and transitional kindergarten pupils, and to provide California state preschool program, transitional kindergarten, and kindergarten teachers with training in providing instruction in inclusive classrooms, culturally responsive instruction, supporting dual language learners, enhancing social-emotional learning, implementing trauma-informed practices and restorative practices, and
 mitigating implicit biases to eliminate exclusionary discipline, pursuant to this subdivision.

(3) Local educational agencies receiving grants pursuant to this subdivision shall do all of the following.

(A) Commit to providing program data to the department, as specified by the department, including, but not limited to, recipient information and participating in overall program evaluation.

(B) (i) Ensure expenditures are consistent with their local plan adopted pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (c).

(ii) If the local educational agency did not develop the plan required pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (c), develop a plan for consideration by the governing board or body at a public meeting for how all children in the attendance area of the local educational agency will have access to full-day learning programs the year before kindergarten that meet the needs of parents, including through partnerships with the local educational agency’s expanding learning offerings, the After School Education and Safety Program, the California state preschool program, Head Start programs, and other community-based early learning and care programs. A plan developed pursuant to this clause satisfies the requirements of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (c).

(iii) A plan developed pursuant to clause (ii) shall be made available to review upon request by the department.

(C) Collaborate with their county’s local planning council, local tribes, and the California state preschool program and Head Start program providers in their region.

(D) Offer transitional kindergarten to all eligible pupils interested in transitional kindergarten within their attendance area.

(E) Offer
 full-day transitional kindergarten on any schoolsite offering kindergarten or develop a plan for consideration by the governing board or body at a public meeting on or before June 30, 2028, for how the local educational agency will offer full-day transitional kindergarten on any schoolsite offering kindergarten.

(4) (A) Funds allocated or awarded pursuant to this subdivision shall be expended by June 30, 2032. Notwithstanding any other law, on June 30, 2034, any unexpended funds of
 the amount awarded for purposes of this subdivision shall revert to the General Fund.

(B) The department may allocate or prorate any returned or collected funds pursuant to this subdivision for the purposes provided in subdivision
 (f).

(5) The department shall initiate collection proceedings for grant funds used by local educational agencies in a manner inconsistent with the requirements of this section, including, but not limited to, failing to submit all required data pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3).

(6) It is the intent of the Legislature that local educational agencies support California state preschool programs to transition their service models to offer full-day, high-quality preschool services for three-year-old children, and support Head Start programs to transition to Early Head Start service models for infants and toddlers.

(7) It is further the intent of the Legislature, that local educational agencies offer full-day transitional kindergarten at all schoolsites offering
 kindergarten enrollment, and offer full-day kindergarten for all children in the year before first grade enrollment.

(f) (1) (A) Of the total amount appropriated under subdivision (b), the department shall award one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) in competitive grants to local educational agencies to increase the number of highly-qualified teachers available to serve California state preschool programs and transitional kindergarten pupils, and to provide California state preschool program, transitional kindergarten, and kindergarten teachers with training in providing instruction in inclusive classrooms, culturally responsive instruction, supporting dual language learners, enhancing social-emotional learning, implementing trauma-informed practices and restorative practices, and mitigating implicit biases to eliminate exclusionary discipline, pursuant to this section. These funds shall be
 available for encumbrance until June 30, 2024.

(B) Any funds allocated for purposes of this subdivision pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (c), subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (d), or subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (e) shall be available for encumbrance through June 30, 2034.

(2) The department shall develop and administer a process to award grants under paragraph (1), subject to approval of the executive director of the state board, on a competitive basis to local educational agencies. To apply for a grant, a local educational agency shall submit an application to the department describing how it will allocate funds and increase either the number of credentialed teachers meeting the requirements of subdivision (g) of Section 48000, or the competencies of California state preschool programs, transitional kindergarten, and kindergarten teachers to enhance their ability to provide instruction in inclusive classrooms, provide culturally responsive instruction, support dual language learners, enhance social-emotional learning, implement trauma-informed and restorative practices, and mitigate implicit biases to eliminate exclusionary discipline.

(3) A local
 educational agency may apply on behalf of a consortium of providers within the local educational agency’s program area, including California state preschool programs and Head Start programs operated by community-based organizations.

(4) An applicant shall demonstrate all of the following to be considered for a grant award:

(A) A need for preschool and transitional kindergarten or kindergarten professional development in a region.

(B) A need for preschool and transitional kindergarten teachers in a region.

(C) The presence of, or plan to create, inclusive classroom settings.

(D) The ability to connect the preschool, transitional kindergarten, or kindergarten program to before and after
 school programs and extended day services.

(E) A plan to integrate preschool, transitional kindergarten, and kindergarten professional development opportunities.

(F) A plan for recruiting new preschool, transitional kindergarten, or kindergarten teachers with experience in early learning and care settings and collaborating with institutions of higher education to ensure a qualified prekindergarten teacher pipeline.

(G) A plan for how principals and administrators overseeing the transitional kindergarten program, or other prekindergarten program, will receive training and professional development on the value and tenets of effective instruction for young children.

(5) In awarding grants under paragraph (1), the department shall establish a methodology
 that accounts for all of the following:

(A) The percentage of transitional kindergarten and kindergarten pupils eligible for free and reduced-price meals.

(B) The percentage of dual language learners that the local educational agency is serving or is planning to serve in a California state preschool program or transitional kindergarten program.

(C) The percentage of pupils with disabilities the local educational agency is serving or planning to serve in an inclusive California state preschool program or transitional kindergarten program.

(D) The percentage of pupils served, or planned to be served, in full-day California state preschool, transitional kindergarten, or kindergarten programs offered by the local educational agency or community-based
 organizations.

(E) The extent to which applicants operate in an attendance area where a significant disproportionality of particular races or ethnicities, as described in Section 1418(d) of Title 20 of the United States Code, has been identified in special education.

(F) The extent to which the local educational agency is located in an area that has more than three young children, three to five years of age, inclusive, for every licensed childcare slot.

(G) The extent to which applicants plan to partner with community-based California state preschool programs and Head Start programs in their program area to ensure those teachers have access to professional development along with teachers employed by the local educational agency.

(6) Grants awarded under
 paragraph (1) for professional development may be used for costs associated with the educational expenses of current and future California state preschool program, transitional kindergarten, and kindergarten professionals that support their attainment of required credentials, permits, or professional development in early childhood instruction or child development, including developing competencies in serving inclusive classrooms and dual language learners. Professional development grant funds shall be used for any of the following purposes:

(A) Tuition, supplies, and other related educational expenses.

(B) Transportation and childcare costs incurred as a result of attending classes.

(C) Substitute teacher pay for California state preschool program, transitional kindergarten, and kindergarten professionals that are
 currently working in a California state preschool program, transitional kindergarten, or kindergarten classroom.

(D) Stipends and professional development expenses, as determined by the Superintendent.

(E) Career, course, and professional development coaching, counseling, and navigation services.

(F) Linked courses, cohorts, or apprenticeship models.

(G) Training and professional development for principals and other administrators of transitional kindergarten, kindergarten, and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, on the value and tenets of effective instruction for young children.

(H) Other educational expenses, as determined by the Superintendent.

(7) Local educational agencies awarded funding pursuant to paragraph (1) may partner with local or online accredited institutions of higher education or local agencies that provide high-quality or credit-bearing trainings, or apprenticeship programs that integrate and embed higher education coursework with on-the-job training of professionals.

(8) Professional learning provided pursuant to this subdivision shall, as applicable, be aligned to the preschool learning foundations and academic standards pursuant to Sections 51226, 60605, 60605.1, 60605.2, 60605.3, 60605.4, 60605.8, and 60605.11, as those sections read on June 30, 2020, and former Section 60605.85, as that section read on June 30, 2014.

(9) Local educational agencies receiving grants under this subdivision shall commit to providing program data to the
 department, as specified by the department, including, but not necessarily limited to, recipient information, including demographic information, educational progress, and the type of courses taken, and participating in overall program evaluation.

(10) The department shall provide a report to the Department of Finance and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature on or before October 1, 2024, on the expenditure of funds and relevant outcome data in order to evaluate the impact of the grants awarded under this subdivision.

(11) (A) Funds allocated or awarded pursuant to this subdivision shall be expended by June 30, 2028. Notwithstanding any other law, on June 30, 2029, any unexpended funds of the amount awarded for purposes of this subdivision shall revert to the General Fund.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), any unexpended funds allocated for purposes of this subdivision pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (c), subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) of subdivision
 (d), and subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (e) shall be expended by June 30, 2034. Notwithstanding any other law, any unexpended funds of the amount awarded for purposes of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (4) of subdivision
 (c), subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (d), and subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (e) shall revert to the General Fund on June 30, 2035.

(g) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Full-day transitional kindergarten” means full-day transitional kindergarten as authorized pursuant to Section 8973.

(2) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(h) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriation made by subdivision (b) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the 2020–21 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to
 Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2020–21 fiscal year.

(i) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriation made by subdivision (d) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the 2021–22 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2021–22 fiscal year.

(j) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriation made by subdivision (e) shall be deemed to be “General
 Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the 2025–26 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2025–26 fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 250, Sec. 3.   (SB 133)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 14. Contract Procedures [8325. - 8334.]

8325.

The department shall develop an annual calendar identifying target dates for contract application deadlines, contract award announcements, contract approvals, and contract evaluations. Each calendar shall be available to the public and shall be updated at least annually.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8440 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 220.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8326.

The department shall develop and maintain a central distribution list for application announcements.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8441 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 221.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8327.

Application announcements shall contain, but not be limited to, the following information: the goals and objectives of the program, identification of the specific minimum range of services to be purchased related to those goals, quantitative as well as qualitative measures that will be used by the department to evaluate service outcomes, specific criteria and a description of the methodology and timetable
 that will be followed to review and approve applications, and all minimum performance standards any agency is required to meet prior to contract approval.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8442 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 222.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8329.

(a) The department shall include all of the following in the application announcement:

(1) The time estimated for each step.

(2) The specific staff names, office addresses, and telephone numbers for those responsible for each step.

(3) The legal requirements and signatory approvals required prior to final approval of any contract.

(4) Any conditions for advance payments shall also be identified.

(b) This information shall be provided in any application announcement.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8443 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 223.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8330.

The department shall identify and transmit to all agencies awarded contracts forms required for contract payments, management information or reports required pursuant to contract objectives, and conditions and methods for contract evaluations. Methods and conditions for payment recoveries,
 withholding of payments, and contract terminations relating to nonperformance shall also be identified. This information shall be provided in all cases prior to final approval of any
 contract, unless the information is provided in the contract document.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8444 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 224.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8331.

The department shall develop a grievance procedure for resolving disputes arising from the awarding or administering of contracts, in addition to the remedies provided under the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the
 Government Code).

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8445 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 225.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8332.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that greater efficiencies may be achieved in the execution of state subsidized preschool program contracts with public and private agencies by the timely approval of contract provisions by the Department of Finance, the Department of General Services, and the department and by authorizing the department to establish a multiyear application, contract expenditure, and service
 review as may be necessary to provide timely service while preserving audit and oversight functions to protect the public welfare.

(b) The Department of Finance and the Department of General Services shall approve or disapprove annual contract funding terms and conditions, including the family fee schedules, and contract face sheets submitted by the department not more than 30 working days from the date of
 submission, unless unresolved conflicts remain between the Department of Finance, the department, and the Department of General Services. The department shall resolve conflicts within an additional 30 working day time period. Contracts and funding terms and conditions shall be issued to contractors no later than June 1. Applications for new preschool funding shall be issued not more than 45 working days after the effective date of authorized new allocations of preschool moneys.

(c) With respect to subdivision (b), it is the intent of the Legislature that the Department of Finance annually review contract funding terms and conditions for the primary purpose of ensuring consistency between contracts and the budget. This review shall include evaluating any proposed changes to contract language or other fiscal documents to which the contractor
 is required to adhere, including those changes to terms or conditions that authorize higher reimbursement rates, modify related adjustment factors, modify administrative or other service allowances, or diminish fee revenues otherwise available for services, to determine if the change is necessary or has the potential effect of reducing the number of full-time equivalent children that may be served.

(d) Notwithstanding the June 1 date specified in subdivision (b), changes to the fee schedule may be made at any other time to reflect the availability of accurate data necessary for
 its completion, provided it receives the approval of the Department of Finance. The Department of Finance shall review the changes within 30 working days of submission and the department shall resolve conflicts within an additional 30 working day period. Contractors shall be given adequate notice before the effective date of the approved schedules. It is the intent of the Legislature that contracts for services not be delayed by the timing of the availability of accurate data needed to update these schedules.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8447 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 226.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8333.

The department may execute a multiyear application process. Multiyear applications may only be submitted by public and private agencies that have been fully compliant in executing prior contracts for at least the preceding three fiscal years as evidenced by all of the following:

(a) No fiscal audit disclaimer.

(b) No program quality deficiencies.

(c) No contract compliance deficiencies.

(d) No incidents of child abuse or molestation.

(e) No program management, administrative, or staffing deficiencies.

(f) Any other criteria as may be deemed necessary to safeguard the public trust.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8447.5 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 227.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8334.

(a) (1) The State Department of Education shall develop and implement a streamlined request for application process for existing California state preschool program contractors to be awarded new California state preschool program slots.

(2) The State Department of Education shall collaborate with the State Department of Social Services to ensure the streamlined request for application process pursuant to paragraph (1) is, where applicable, similar to the streamlined request for application process in the general childcare and development program.

(b) A contractor who meets any of the following conditions during a request for application cycle shall be
 ineligible for the streamlined request for application process:

(1) The contractor is on conditional status because of fiscal or programmatic noncompliance.

(2) The State Department of Education has conducted a review pursuant to Section 17794 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations and the contractor has failed to resolve items of fiscal and programmatic noncompliance identified in the review within 12 months of the issuance of the review report.

(3) The State Department of Education has evidence that the contractor has not been able to successfully fulfill current contract requirements by serving children in a quality program and fiscally responsible manner.

(4) As described in Section 8316, the contractor has in place or places, a person in
 a position of fiscal responsibility or control who has been convicted of a crime involving misuse or misappropriation of state or federal funds or a state or federal crime involving moral turpitude.

(5) The State Department of Education reduced the contractor’s current year maximum reimbursement amount due to the contractor’s inability to utilize its full contract amount because of low enrollment or low expenditures for the same contract type.

(6) The contractor was previously awarded state preschool program expansion funding and has not yet started to provide services with that funding.

(7) The contractor has an outstanding accounts receivable balance with the State Department of Education.

(8) The contractor has a delinquent audit pursuant to Section
 17825 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 73, Sec. 16.   (SB 163)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 15. Contract Audit Requirements [8335. - 8336.]

8335.

As used in this article:

(a) “Financial and compliance audit” means a systematic review or appraisal to determine each of the following:

(1) Whether the financial statements of an audited organization fairly present the financial position and the results of financial operations in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles.

(2) Whether the organization has complied with laws and regulations that may have a material effect upon the financial statements.

(b) “Public accountants” means certified public accountants, or state licensed public accountants.

(c) “Independent auditors” means public accountants who have no direct or indirect relationship with the functions or activities being audited or with the business conducted by any of the officials or contractors being audited.

(d) “Generally accepted auditing standards” means the auditing standards set forth in the financial and compliance element of the “Government Auditing Standards” issued by the Comptroller General of the United States and incorporating the audit standards of the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants.

(e) “Nonprofit organization” means an organization described in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 which is exempt from taxation under Section 501(a) of that code, or any nonprofit, scientific, or educational organization qualified under Section 23701d of the Revenue
 and Taxation Code.

(f) (1) Annually, there shall be a single independent financial and compliance audit of organizations that contract with the department to provide preschool services or other support services under the jurisdiction of the department pursuant to this chapter. Any such audit shall include an evaluation of the accounting and control systems of the contractor and of the activities by the contractor to comply with the financial and compliance requirements of contracts received by the contractor from the state agency. The financial and compliance requirements to be reviewed during the audit shall be those developed and published by the department. Audits carried out pursuant to this section shall be audits of the contractor rather than audits of individual contracts or programs. In the case of any contractor that receives less than
 one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000)
 per year from any state agency, the audit required by this section shall be conducted biennially, unless there is evidence of fraud or other violation of state law in connection with the contract. The cost of the audit may be included in contracts.

(2) The organization receiving funds from the state shall be responsible for obtaining the required financial and compliance audits of the organization and any subcontractors, except for subcontracts exempt from the department’s review, as agreed to by the Departments of Finance and General Services. The audits shall be made by independent auditors in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards. The audit shall be completed by the 15th day of the fifth month following the end of the contractor’s fiscal year. A copy of the required audit shall be filed with the department upon its completion. In the event an audit is not filed, the department shall notify the organization of
 the contract violation. The audit report filed shall be an integral part of the contract file.

(g) (1) Nothing in this article limits the authority of the department to make audits of contracts. However, if independent audits arranged for by contractors meet generally accepted auditing standards, the department shall rely on those audits and any additional audit work shall build upon the work already done.

(2) Nothing in this article precludes the state from conducting, or contracting for the conduct of, contract performance audits which are not financial and compliance audits.

(3) Nothing in this article limits the state’s responsibility or authority to enforce state law or regulations, procedures, or reporting requirements arising pursuant thereto.

(4) Nothing in this article limits the responsibility of the department to provide an independent appeal procedure according to the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 62, Sec. 12.   (AB 210)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

8336.

(a) All contractors are encouraged to develop and maintain a reserve within the child development fund, derived from earned but unexpended funds. Contractors may retain all earned